apertium-ml-en.ml.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
      <sdefs>
            <sdef n="n"/>
            <sdef n="sg"/>
            <sdef n="pl"/>
            <sdef n="kaL_"/>
      </sdefs>
      <pardefs>
            <pardef n="gramofon__n">
         		<e><p>
         			<l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
         		</p></e>
         		<e><p>
         			<l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/>
         			</r>
                  </p></e>
            </pardef>
            <pardef n="mara__n">
               <e><p>
                        <l>ങ്ങള്‍</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
               </p></e>
               <e><p>
                        <l>ം</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
               </p></e>
                  
            </pardef>
      </pardefs>
      <section id="main" type="standard">
            <e lm="gramofon"><i>gramofon</i><par n="gramofon__n"/></e>
   		<!-- lm, is for lemma.
                  i, is for identity (the left and the right are the same).
                  par, is for paradigm.-->
            <e lm="mara"><i>മര</i><par n="mara__n"/></e>
      </section>
</dictionary>
